tr: Bisiklet özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir tutamaç; Dahili fren lambası; Dahili ön ışık; Sertifikalı güvenlik; Ağır iş tipi frenler; LED kontrol paneli; Bagaj rafı; Delinmeye dayanıklı lastikler; Teleskopik koltuk; Diğer
es: Características de la bicicleta: Manillar ajustable; Luz de freno incorporada; Luz frontal incorporada; Certificación de seguridad; Frenos de alta resistencia; Panel de control LED; Portaequipajes; Neumáticos resistentes a pinchazos; Sillín telescópico; Otros
hu: Kerékpár jellemzői: Állítható kormány; Beépített féklámpa; Beépített első lámpa; Biztonsági tanúsítvány; Nagy teljesítményű fékek; LED vezérlőpanel; Csomagtartó; Defektmentes gumiabroncsok; Teleszkópos ülés; Egyéb
pl: Charakterystyka roweru: Regulowana rączka; Wbudowane światło stopu; Wbudowana lampka robocza; Certyfikat bezpieczeństwa; Wytrzymałe hamulce; Panel sterowania LED; Bagażnik; Opony odporne na przebicie; Gniazdo teleskopowe; Inne
it: Funzionalità della bicicletta: Manubrio regolabile; Luce di frenata incorporata; Luce anteriore incorporata; Caratteristiche di sicurezza certificate; Freni per carichi pesanti; Pannello di controllo LED; Scaffale portabagagli e borse; Pneumatici resistenti alle forature; Sedile telescopico; Altro
ko: 자전거 기능: 조절식 핸들바; 내장 브레이크등; 내장 전면 조명; 안전 인증; 헤비 듀티 브레이크; LED 제어판; 수하물 선반; 펑크 내성 타이어; 접이식 좌석; 기타
zh-TW: 自行車特點: 車把可調; 內建煞車燈; 內建頭燈; 安全認證; 重型煞車; LED 控制面板; 行李架; 耐穿刺輪胎; 遠近伸縮式座椅; 其他
sv: Detaljer för cykel: Justerbart styre; Inbyggt bromsljus; Inbyggt framljus; Certifierad säkerhet; Kraftiga bromsar; LED-kontrollpanel; Väskhylla; Punkteringssäkra däck; Teleskopsäte; Övrigt
pt-PT: Características da bicicleta: Guiador ajustável; Luz de travagem integrada; Luz frontal integrada; Segurança certificada; Travões de alta resistência; Painel de controlo LED; Suporte da bagagem; Pneus resistentes a perfurações; Assento telescópico; Outro
de: Fahrradeigenschaften: Verstellbarer Lenker; Eingebautes Bremslicht; Eingebautes Frontlicht; Zertifizierte Sicherheit; Hochleistungsbremsen; LED-Bedienfeld; Gepäckablage; Pannensichere Reifen; Teleskopsitz; Sonstiges
nl: Kenmerken fiets: Verstelbare duwstang; Ingebouwd remlicht; Ingebouwd voorlicht; Gecertificeerde veiligheid; Zware remmen; Led-bedieningspaneel; Bagagerek; Banden die bestand zijn tegen perforaties; Uitschuifbare stoel; Andere
pt-BR: Características da bicicleta: Guidão ajustável; Luz de freio integrada; Luz frontal integrada; Segurança certificada; Freios para serviços pesados; Painel de controle de LED; Suporte para bagagem; Pneus resistentes a perfurações; Banco retrátil; Outro
th: คุณลักษณะของจักรยาน: ราวมือจับแบบปรับได้; มีไฟเบรกในตัว; มีไฟหน้าในตัว; รับรองความปลอดภัย; เบรกของเครื่องยนต์หนัก; แผงควบคุมไฟ LED; ชั้นวางกระเป๋าเดินทาง; ยางแบบป้องกันการแตกรั่วซึม; ที่นั่งแบบยืดหดได้; อื่นๆ
da: Cykelfunktioner: Justerbart styr; Indbygget bremselys; Indbygget frontlys; Certificeret sikkerhed; Kraftige bremser; LED-kontrolpanel; Bagagehylde; Punkteringssikre dæk; Teleskopsæde; Andet
sl-SI: Lastnosti kolesa: Nastavljivo krmilo; Vgrajena zavorna luč; Vgrajena sprednja luč; Certificirana varnost; Močne zavore; LED nadzorna plošča; Prtljažnik; Pnevmatike, odporne na predrtje; Teleskopski sedež; Drugo
fr: Caractéristiques du vélo: Guidon réglable; Feu stop intégré; Feu avant intégré; Sécurité certifiée; Freins robustes; Panneau de commande LED; Porte-bagages; Pneus résistants aux crevaisons; Siège télescopique; Autre
fi: Polkupyörän ominaisuudet: Säädettävä ohjaustanko; Sisäänrakennettu jarruvalo; Sisäänrakennettu etuvalo; Sertifioitu turvallisuus; Raskaan käytön jarrut; LED-ohjauspaneeli; Matkatavarateline; Puhkaisun kestävät renkaat; Teleskooppinen istuin; Muu
ro-RO: Caracteristici bicicletă: Ghidon reglabil; Lumină de frână încorporată; Lumină față încorporată; Siguranță certificată; Frâne de mare putere; Panou de control LED; Suport pentru bagaje; Pneuri rezistente la perforare; Scaun telescopic; Altele
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ποδηλάτου: Ρυθμιζόμενο τιμόνι; Ενσωματωμένο φως φρένων; Ενσωματωμένο μπροστινό φως; Πιστοποιημένη ασφάλεια; Φρένα μεγάλης αντοχής; Πίνακας ελέγχου LED; Σχάρα αποσκευών; Λάστιχα ανθεκτικά στη διάτρηση; Τηλεσκοπικό κάθισμα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Dviračio ypatybės: Reguliuojama rankena; Įmontuota stabdžių lemputė; Įmontuotas priekinis žibintas; Sertifikuotas saugumas; Didelio našumo stabdžiai; LED valdymo skydelis; Bagažinės tvirtinimas; Pradūrimui atsparios padangos; Teleskopinė sėdynė; Kita
vi: Tính năng xe đạp: Tay cầm có thể điều chỉnh; Đèn phanh gắn kèm; Có đèn trước; Đã chứng nhận an toàn; Phanh hạng nặng; Bảng điều khiển LED; Giá để hành lý; Lốp chống thủng; Ghế ống lồng; Khác
ru: Характеристики велосипеда: Регулируемый руль; Встроенный стоп-сигнал; Встроенный передний фонарь; Сертифицированная безопасность; Мощные тормоза; Светодиодная панель управления; Багажник; Шины, устойчивые к проколам; Телескопическое сиденье; Другое
zh-CN: 自行车特点: 可调车把; 内置刹车灯; 内置前灯; 安全认证; 重型制动器; LED 控制面板; 行李架; 防扎轮胎; 弹簧坐垫; 其他
ja: 自転車の特徴: 調整可能ハンドルバー; 内蔵ブレーキランプ; 備え付け前面ライト; 認証された安全性; 強力なブレーキ; LEDコントロールパネル; 網棚; 耐穿刺性タイヤ; 伸縮シート; その他
cs: Vlastnosti jízdního kola: Nastavitelná rukojeť; Integrované brzdové světlo; Vestavěné přední světlo; Certifikovaná bezpečnost; Silné brzdy; LED ovládací panel; Nosič zavazadel; Pneumatiky odolné proti propíchnutí; Teleskopické sedátko; Jiné
en: Bicycle features: Adjustable handlebar; Built-in brake light; Built-in front light; Certified safety; Heavy duty brakes; LED control panel; Luggage rack; Puncture resistant tires; Telescoping seat; Other
sk-SK: Vlastnosti bicykla: Nastaviteľné riadidlá; Zabudované brzdové svetlo; Zabudované predné svetlo; Certifikovaná bezpečnosť; Vysokovýkonné brzdy; LED ovládací panel; Nosič na batožinu; Pneumatiky odolné proti prepichnutiu; Teleskopické sedadlo; Iné
bg-BG: Характеристики на велосипеда: Регулируемо кормило; Вградена спирачна светлина; Вградена предна светлина; Сертифицирана безопасност; Спирачки за тежки условия; LED контролен панел; Поставка за багаж; Устойчиви на спукване гуми; Телескопична седалка; Други
nb: Sykkelfunksjoner: Regulerbart styre; Innebygde bremselys; Innebygd frontlys; Sertifisert sikkerhet; Kraftige bremser; LED-kontrollpanel; Bagasjehylle; Punkteringsbestandige hjul; Teleskopsete; Annet
hr-HR: Značajke bicikla: Podesivi volan; Ugrađeno stop-svjetlo; Ugrađeno prednje svjetlo; Sigurnosno certificirano; Kočnice za teške uvjete; LED upravljačka ploča; Nosač za prtljagu; Gume otporne na probijanje; Teleskopsko sjedalo; Ostalo